Florida, session 2026, SB1438.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.âPart XII of chapter 400, Florida Statutes, 39 consisting of ss. 400.9991-400.9998, is created and entitled 40 âMedically Complex Childrenâs Homes.â 41 Section 2.âSection 400.9991, Florida Statutes, is created 42 to read: 43 400.9991âLegislative intent.âIt is the intent of the 44 Legislature to develop, establish, and enforce licensure 45 requirements and basic standards for medically complex 46 childrenâs homes in order to ensure that the homes are family 47 centered and that the medical, developmental, physiological, 48 nutritional, and psychosocial needs of medically complex 49 children residing in such homes are met. Medically complex 50 childrenâs homes shall serve as a safe home-like setting with 51 clinical oversight for children with complex medical needs as an 52 alternative to institutional care. This setting is intended to 53 meet the needs of children and families in this state, offering 54 smaller homes geographically close to parents and guardians to 55 maintain family connections for the medically complex children 56 served. Medically complex childrenâs homes are not intended to 57 serve children whose parents and guardians live outside of this 58 state, as out-of-state residency does not support family 59 involvement with the child. 60 Section 3.âSection 400.9992, Florida Statutes, is created 61 to read: 62 400.9992âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 63 (1)ââAgencyâ means the Agency for Health Care 64 Administration. 65 (2)ââMedically complex childrenâs homeâ means any 66 residential home that undertakes, through its ownership or 67 management, to provide residential services for up to six 68 children who are medically dependent or technologically 69 dependent upon medical equipment or procedures and who are not 70 related to the owner or operator of the home by blood, marriage, 71 or adoption. A medically complex childrenâs home serves 72 medically dependent or technologically dependent children as 73 defined in s. 400.902(6). 74 Section 4.âSection 400.9993, Florida Statutes, is created 75 to read: 76 400.9993âLicensure required; exemptions.â 77 (1)âThe requirements of part II of chapter 408 apply to the 78 provision of services that require licensure pursuant to this 79 part and part II of chapter 408 and to entities licensed by or 80 applying for such licensure from the agency pursuant to this 81 part. A license issued by the agency is required for the 82 operation of a medically complex childrenâs home in this state. 83 (2)âSeparate licenses are required for homes maintained in 84 separate premises which are operated under the same management. 85 (3)âA medical foster home licensed by the Department of 86 Children and Families is exempt from licensure under this part. 87 (4)(a)âA community residential group home licensed under 88 chapter 393 which provides residential care for medically 89 complex children is deemed to satisfy the requirements for 90 initial licensure under this part if the home meets each of the 91 following criteria: 92 1.âThe home held a license in good standing under chapter 93 393 as of June 30, 2026. 94 2.âThe home shares common ownership with all of the 95 following: 96 a.âA health agency licensed under part III of chapter 400 97 providing private duty nursing services by registered nurses or 98 licensed practical nurses. 99 b.âA prescribed pediatric extended care center licensed 100 under part VI of chapter 400. 101 c.âA home medical equipment provider licensed under part 102 VII of chapter 400. 103 d.âA health care clinic licensed under part X of chapter 104 400 providing speech-language therapy, physical therapy, or 105 occupational therapy. 106 (b)âA community residential group home that meets the 107 requirements in paragraph (a) must submit an application for 108 licensure to the agency within 60 days after the adoption of 109 agency licensure rules and must comply with the minimum 110 standards and requirements to maintain licensure pursuant to 111 this part. 112 Section 5.âSection 400.9994, Florida Statutes, is created 113 to read: 114 400.9994âLicensure application requirements.â 115 (1)âEach application for initial licensure or license 116 renewal must meet the requirements specified in this part and 117 part II of chapter 408. 118 (2)âThe initial application must contain the location of 119 the medically complex childrenâs home for which a license is 120 sought and documentation, signed by the appropriate local 121 government official, which states that the applicant has met 122 local zoning requirements. 123 (3)âThe agency shall require level 2 background screening 124 for personnel pursuant to s. 408.809(1)(e) and chapter 435. 125 (4)âIn addition to the requirements of s. 408.811, access 126 to a medically complex childrenâs home must be provided at 127 reasonable times for the appropriate officials of the agency, 128 the Department of Health, the Department of Children and 129 Families, and the State Fire Marshal, who are responsible for 130 the development and maintenance of fire, health, sanitary, and 131 safety standards, and Medicaid requirements, to inspect the home 132 to ensure compliance with these standards. 133 (5)âIn addition to the license categories available in s. 134 408.808: 135 (a)âThe agency shall issue a provisional license for a 136 period of no more than 6 months to an applicant for initial 137 licensure which meets all of the licensure requirements of this 138 part and part II of chapter 408. 139 1.âThe licensee shall notify the agency in writing when at 140 least one child has been admitted to the home, after which an 141 unannounced inspection shall be made to determine compliance 142 with the requirements of a medically complex childrenâs home. 143 2.âA provisional licensee that demonstrates compliance with 144 all the requirements of a medically complex childrenâs home 145 license during the inspection must be issued a medically complex 146 childrenâs home license. 147 3.âIn addition to sanctions authorized under this part, if 148 violations are found during the inspection and the licensee 149 fails to demonstrate compliance with all medically complex 150 childrenâs home requirements during a follow-up inspection, the 151 licensee may not admit any new children for medically complex 152 childrenâs home services. The agency may extend the provisional 153 license for not more than 1 month after verification of 154 correction of violations through the second, follow-up 155 inspection. If violations are found during the second, follow-up 156 inspection, the agency may not extend the provisional license 157 any further. The licensee shall promptly create and implement a 158 plan for the safe and orderly discharge of the children being 159 cared for under the medically complex childrenâs home license. 160 (b)âThe agency may issue a conditional license to a 161 facility if, at the time of license renewal, the facility is 162 found to have any uncorrected violation that the facility had an 163 opportunity to correct. A conditional license must be limited to 164 a specified period not exceeding 6 months. 165 (6)âThe agency shall conduct licensure inspections of 166 medically complex childrenâs homes and quarterly monitor visits. 167 Section 6.âSection 400.9995, Florida Statutes, is created 168 to read: 169 400.9995âRules establishing minimum standards.âThe agency 170 may adopt rules to administer this part and part II of chapter 171 408, which rules must include reasonable and fair minimum 172 standards in relation to all of the following: 173 (1)âA safe and sanitary environment that is residential and 174 noninstitutional in design or nature and allows for 175 technological advances in the provision of care, safety, and 176 security, including the use of devices, equipment, and other 177 security measures related to the general safety and security of 178 residents, staff, and the home. 179 (2)âAccommodation of the needs and preferences of residents 180 to enhance the quality of life in a medically complex childrenâs 181 home. 182 (3)âThe provision of individualized medical, developmental, 183 and family training services. 184 (4)âThe number and qualifications of all personnel 185 responsible for the care of the children served, based on the 186 age and acuity of the children. A medically complex childrenâs 187 home must have licensed nursing staff on duty in the home at all 188 times. 189 (5)âAll sanitary conditions within the medically complex 190 childrenâs home and its surroundings, including water supply, 191 sewage disposal, food handling, and general hygiene, and 192 maintenance thereof, which will ensure the health and comfort of 193 the children served. 194 (6)âPrograms and basic services promoting and maintaining a 195 homelike environment and the health and development of the 196 children served, including facilitating school services. Such 197 programs and services must include development, implementation, 198 and monitoring of a comprehensive protocol of care, developed in 199 conjunction with the parent or guardian, which specifies the 200 medical, nursing, psychosocial, and developmental therapies 201 required by the medically dependent or technologically dependent 202 child served. 203 (7)âRequirements for assisting with supportive services, 204 including, but not limited to, speech therapy, occupational 205 therapy, physical therapy, social work, child development and 206 psychological services, and transportation. 207 (8)âMaintenance of appropriate medical records, data, and 208 information relative to the children and programs. Such records 209 must be accessible to the agency for inspection during onsite 210 visits. 211 (9)âThe use of video cameras and electronic monitoring 212 within the medically complex childrenâs home to include areas 213 where monitoring is required and areas where monitoring is 214 permitted only with the consent of the residentâs parent or 215 guardian. 216 (10)âRequirements for child bedrooms, including criteria 217 for a private room and the permissible circumstances for a 218 shared room. 219 (11)âDischarge and transfer planning for a child, including 220 a child who becomes ineligible for services from the home. 221 Discharge planning must be initiated at least 18 months before 222 the residentâs 21st birthday to enable a smooth transition to an 223 appropriate setting. The rules must also specify advance notice 224 requirements. 225 (12)âAdmission and assessment of children. 226 (13)âEstablishment of necessary procedures, identification 227 of forms, specification of required documentation, and 228 clarification of terms, as necessary, to administer this part. 229 Section 7.âSection 400.9996, Florida Statutes, is created 230 to read: 231 400.9996âResident eligibility and admission.âTo qualify for 232 admission to a medically complex childrenâs home, a child must: 233 (1)âBe admitted from a higher level of care in an in-state 234 facility, such as a hospital or skilled nursing facility, or 235 from the home of a parent or guardian whose primary residence is 236 in this state. 237 (2)âHave a chronic debilitating disease or condition of one 238 or more physiological or organ systems which generally makes the 239 child dependent upon 24-hour medical, nursing, or health 240 supervision or intervention. Medically fragile children are 241 medically complex, and their medical condition is such that they 242 are technologically dependent upon medical equipment or 243 procedures to sustain life and can expire without warning unless 244 continually under observation. 245 (3)âHave a written order by the childâs attending physician 246 in consultation with the parent or legal guardian. The 247 recommendations for placement of a Medicaid applicant or 248 recipient in the medically complex childrenâs home must be made 249 by the Childrenâs Multidisciplinary Assessment Team of the 250 Department of Health under s. 391.025. Consideration must be 251 given to relevant medical, emotional, psychosocial, and 252 environmental factors. 253 Section 8.âSection 400.9997, Florida Statutes, is created 254 to read: 255 400.9997âUniform firesafety requirements; emergency 256 preparedness; construction standards.â 257 (1)âUniform firesafety standards for medically complex 258 childrenâs homes, which are residential board and care 259 occupancies, shall be established by the State Fire Marshal 260 pursuant to s. 633.206. 261 (2)âPermanent onsite generators must be installed and 262 maintained. 263 (3)âAn automatic fire sprinkler system must be installed 264 and maintained. 265 (4)âA firesafety evacuation capability determination must 266 be conducted within 6 months after the date of initial licensure 267 of a medically complex childrenâs home. 268 (5)âComprehensive emergency management plans required by s. 269 408.821 must be submitted for review and approval to the local 270 emergency management agency. 271 (6)âAll medically complex childrenâs homes must have an 272 annual fire inspection conducted by the local fire marshal or 273 authority having jurisdiction. 274 (7)âThe requirements for the construction or renovation of 275 a medically complex childrenâs home must comply with all of the 276 following: 277 (a)âThe provisions of chapter 553 pertaining to building 278 construction standards, including plumbing, electrical codes, 279 glass, manufactured buildings, and accessibility for the 280 physically disabled. 281 (b)âSection 633.206 and applicable rules pertaining to 282 physical standards for community residential care facilities. 283 (c)âThe standards or rules adopted pursuant to this part 284 and part II of chapter 408. 285 (8)âThe agency may adopt rules to implement this section. 286 Section 9.âSection 400.9998, Florida Statutes, is created 287 to read: 288 400.9998âDenial, suspension, and revocation of licensure; 289 violations; administrative fines.â 290 (1)âIn accordance with part II of chapter 408, the agency 291 may deny, revoke, and suspend a license and impose an 292 administrative fine for the violation of any provision of this 293 part, part II of chapter 408, or applicable rules. 294 (2)âA violation of this part, part II of chapter 408, or 295 applicable rules is subject to fines specified in s. 408.813. A 296 violation must be classified according to the nature of the 297 violation and the gravity of its probable effect on residents. 298 The agency shall indicate the classification on the written 299 notice of the violation as follows: 300 (a)âClass I violations as described in s. 408.813. The 301 agency shall issue a citation regardless of correction and 302 impose an administrative fine of $500 for an isolated violation, 303 $750 for a patterned violation, or $1,000 for a widespread 304 violation. 305 (b)âClass II violations as described in s. 408.813. The 306 agency shall impose an administrative fine of $400 for an 307 isolated violation, $600 for a patterned violation, or $800 for 308 a widespread violation. 309 (c)âClass III violations as described in s. 408.813. The 310 agency shall impose an administrative fine of $200 for an 311 isolated violation, $300 for a patterned violation, or $400 for 312 a widespread violation. If a deficiency giving rise to a class 313 III violation is corrected within the time specified by the 314 agency, the fine may not be imposed. 315 (d)âClass IV violations as described in s. 408.813. The 316 agency shall impose for a cited class IV violation an 317 administrative fine of at least $100 but not exceeding $200 for 318 each violation. If a deficiency giving rise to a class IV 319 violation is corrected within the time specified by the agency, 320 the fine may not be imposed. 321 (3)âThe agency may impose an administrative fine for an 322 unclassified violation pursuant to s. 408.813(3). The agency may 323 impose an administrative fine of $500 if a licensee is found not 324 to be in compliance with the background screening requirements 325 as provided in s. 408.809. 326 Section 10.âSubsection (1) of section 435.12, Florida 327 Statutes, is amended to read: 328 435.12âCare Provider Background Screening Clearinghouse.â 329 (1)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration in 330 consultation with the Department of Law Enforcement shall create 331 a secure web-based system, which shall be known as the âCare 332 Provider Background Screening Clearinghouseâ or âclearinghouse.â 333 The clearinghouse must allow the results of criminal history 334 checks provided to the specified agencies and, beginning January 335 1, 2026, or a later date as determined by the Agency for Health 336 Care Administration, to qualified entities participating in the 337 clearinghouse for screening of persons qualified as care 338 providers under s. 943.0542 to be shared among the specified 339 agencies and qualified entities when a person has applied to 340 volunteer, be employed, be licensed, enter into a contract, or 341 has an affiliation that allows or requires a state and national 342 fingerprint-based criminal history check. Beginning January 1, 343 2025, or a later date as determined by the Agency for Health 344 Care Administration, the Agency for Health Care Administration 345 shall review and determine eligibility for all criminal history 346 checks submitted to the clearinghouse for the Department of 347 Education. The clearinghouse shall share eligibility 348 determinations with the Department of Education and the 349 qualified entities. Beginning July 1, 2028, or a later date as 350 determined by the Agency for Health Care Administration, the 351 agency shall review and determine eligibility for all criminal 352 history checks submitted to the clearinghouse for specified 353 agencies as defined in s. 435.02. The clearinghouse shall share 354 eligibility determinations with the specified agencies. The 355 Agency for Health Care Administration and the Department of Law 356 Enforcement may adopt rules to create forms or implement 357 procedures needed to carry out this section. 358 Section 11.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (1) of 359 section 400.051, Florida Statutes, to read: 360 400.051âHomes or institutions exempt from the provisions of 361 this part.â 362 (1)âThe following shall be exempt from the provisions of 363 this part: 364 (d)âAny medically complex childrenâs home licensed under 365 part XII of this chapter. 366 Section 12.âSubsection (26) is added to section 408.802, 367 Florida Statutes, to read: 368 408.802âApplicability.âThis part applies to the provision 369 of services that require licensure as defined in this part and 370 to the following entities licensed, registered, or certified by 371 the agency, as described in chapters 112, 383, 390, 394, 395, 372 400, 429, 440, and 765: 373 (26)âMedically complex childrenâs homes, as provided under 374 part XII of chapter 400. 375 Section 13.âSubsection (25) is added to section 408.820, 376 Florida Statutes, to read: 377 408.820âExemptions.âExcept as prescribed in authorizing 378 statutes, the following exemptions shall apply to specified 379 requirements of this part: 380 (25)âMedically complex childrenâs homes, as provided under 381 part XII of chapter 400, are exempt from s. 408.810(10). 382 Section 14.âSubsection (1) of section 408.823, Florida 383 Statutes, is amended to read: 384 408.823âIn-person visitation.â 385 (1)âThis section applies to developmental disabilities 386 centers as defined in s. 393.063, hospitals licensed under 387 chapter 395, nursing home facilities licensed under part II of 388 chapter 400, hospice facilities licensed under part IV of 389 chapter 400, intermediate care facilities for the 390 developmentally disabled licensed and certified under part VIII 391 of chapter 400, medically complex childrenâs homes licensed 392 under part XII of chapter 400, and assisted living facilities 393 licensed under part I of chapter 429. 394 Section 15.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.